District of Columbia statutes.
42-3255

Fines and penalties.

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or the rules.

Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-303, § 6, 52 DCR 1690

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 6 of Multiple Dwelling Residence Water Lead Level Test Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-206, December 7, 2004, law notification 52 DCR 450).